Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-309
Prosecutions for violations; evidence; immunity of witnesses.

No person shall be excused from attending and testifying or producing books and papers, in any prosecution under sections 18-305 to 18-309, for the reason that the required testimony, documentary or otherwise, may tend to incriminate such person or subject such person to a penalty or forfeiture. No person shall be prosecuted or subjected to any penalty or forfeiture for or on account of any transaction, matter, or thing concerning which such person may testify or produce evidence, documentary or otherwise, in any prosecution under such sections, except that no person so testifying shall be exempt from prosecution for perjury committed in so testifying.

Laws 1897, c. 13, § 8, p. 139;

R.S.1913, § 5223;

C.S.1922, § 4424;

C.S.1929, § 18-408;

R.S.1943, § 18-309;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 9.